Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-219
Town; corporate name.

The corporate name of each town shall be the town of (name of town), and all acts done by the town and all actions by or against the town shall be in its corporate name.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 17, p. 136;

R.S.1913, § 1003;

C.S.1922, § 905;

C.S.1929, § 26-219;

R.S.1943, § 23-219.

All actions by or against a town are required to be in its corporate name. Town of Denver v. Myers, 63 Neb. 107, 88 N.W. 191 (1901).